incubator/apertium-cy-kw.kw.dix
    <pardef n="pen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>now</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="modr/yp__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebeth</l>
          <r>yp<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yp</l>
          <r>yp<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lytherw/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esyon</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ene/p__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bow</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wh/or__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eryth</l>
          <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwy/ns__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>ns<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sow</l>
          <r>ns<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mam__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="del/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kyow</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="owr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="co/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cuw</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gob/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>row</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ly/ver__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>frow</l>
          <r>ver<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ver</l>
          <r>ver<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="selsy/gen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r>gen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>gen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="for/th__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dhow</l>
          <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kyny/ow__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ewyow</l>
          <r>ow<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>ow<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="so/th__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dhow</l>
          <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>th<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fl/ogh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eghes</l>
          <r>ogh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogh</l>
          <r>ogh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="so/thva__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dhvaow</l>
          <r>thva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thva</l>
          <r>thva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gon__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nys</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwythya/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>desow</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="p/ysk__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uskes</l>
          <r>ysk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysk</l>
          <r>ysk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gorh/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olyon</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lagas__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tas/gwyn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gwyn</l>
          <r>gwyn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owgwyn</l>
          <r>gwyn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/os__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eyjy</l>
          <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oy__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tr/os__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eys</l>
          <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pys/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tre__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="moren"><par n="initial-m"/><i>or</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berrheans"><par n="initial-b"/><i>errheans</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sothva"><i>so</i><par n="so/thva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="corf"><i>corf</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cost"><i>cost</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ufern"><i>ufern</i><par n="lagas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nans"><i>nans</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stret"><i>stret</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="selsygen"><i>selsy</i><par n="selsy/gen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gweder"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ed</i><par n="gob/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="towlen"><par n="initial-t"/><i>owlen</i><par n="pen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asclatty"><i>asclatty</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flogh"><i>fl</i><par n="fl/ogh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>as</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clavjy"><i>clavjy</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hos"><i>h</i><par n="h/os__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bason"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ason</i><par n="pen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lytherwas"><i>lytherw</i><par n="lytherw/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mam"><par n="initial-m"/><i>am</i><par n="mam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enep"><i>ene</i><par n="ene/p__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scoth"><i>sco</i><par n="so/th__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pras"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ras</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cres"><i>cres</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="onyonen"><i>onyon</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bonk"><par n="initial-b"/><i>onk</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="syvyen"><i>syvy</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forth"><i>for</i><par n="for/th__n"/></e>
    <e lm="treth"><par n="initial-t"/><i>reth</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puns"><par n="initial-p"/><i>uns</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caretysen"><i>caretys</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comolen"><i>comol</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="droglamm"><par n="initial-d"/><i>roglamm</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tren"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ren</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tasgwyn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>as</i><par n="tas/gwyn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nen"><i>nen</i><par n="pen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cafas"><i>cafas</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gober"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ob</i><par n="gob/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tros"><par n="initial-t"/><i>r</i><par n="tr/os__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bush"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ush</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bal"><par n="initial-b"/><i>al</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sport"><i>sport</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abatti"><i>abatti</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cok"><i>co</i><par n="co/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carjy"><i>carjy</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="whor"><i>wh</i><par n="wh/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwely"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ely</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gal"><par n="initial-g"/><i>al</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyver"><i>nyver</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lagas"><i>lagas</i><par n="lagas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keyn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>eyn</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cawlen"><i>cawl</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cygaret"><i>cygaret</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mor"><par n="initial-m"/><i>or</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blewen"><par n="initial-b"/><i>lew</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eseth"><i>ese</i><par n="so/th__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lost"><i>lost</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soth"><i>so</i><par n="so/th__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frut"><i>frut</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pen"><par n="initial-p"/><i>en</i><par n="pen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lywyans"><i>lywyans</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyver"><i>ly</i><par n="ly/ver__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dowr"><par n="initial-d"/><i>owr</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="owr"><i>owr</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hel"><i>hel</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pysk"><par n="initial-p"/><i></i><par n="p/ysk__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modryp"><par n="initial-m"/><i>odr</i><par n="modr/yp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="losowen"><i>losow</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
